Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 6 RULES OF THE ROAD
§ 49-660. Stopping, standing or parking prohibited in specified places.

Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, in compliance with law, the directions of a peace officer or traffic control device, no person shall:

Stop, stand or park a vehicle:

On the traffic side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a highway;

On a sidewalk;

Within an intersection;

On a crosswalk;

Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty (30) feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless a different length is indicated by signs or markings;

Alongside or opposite any highway excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

On any railroad tracks;

On any controlled-access highway;

At any place where traffic-control devices prohibit stopping.

Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger or passengers:

In front of a public or private driveway;

Within fifteen (15) feet of a fire hydrant;

Within twenty (20) feet of a crosswalk at an intersection;

Within thirty (30) feet upon the approach to any flashing signal, stop sign, yield sign or traffic-control signal located at the side of a highway; provided, however, that local authorities may by ordinance or resolution permit the standing or parking of vehicles which are six (6) feet or less in height within such thirty (30) foot distance, or as may be specified by ordinance or resolution or as may be designated with appropriate signs;

Within twenty (20) feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a highway opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five (75) feet of the entrance (when properly sign-posted);

At any place where traffic-control devices prohibit standing.

Park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading merchandise or passengers:

Within fifty (50) feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;

At any place where traffic-control devices prohibit parking.

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his control into any prohibited area or away from a curb such a distance as to be unlawful.

§ 49-661. Additional parking regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way highway shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels parallel to and within eighteen (18) inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

Except when otherwise provided by local ordinances, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way highway shall be stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the highway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within eighteen (18) inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within eighteen (18) inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

Local authorities may permit angle parking on any highway, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless the transportation department has determined that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic.

§ 49-662. Officers authorized to remove vehicles.

Whenever any peace officer finds a vehicle in violation of any of the provisions of section 49-659, Idaho Code, the officer is authorized to move the vehicle, or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move it to a position off the roadway.

Any peace officer is authorized to remove or cause to be removed to a place of safety any unattended vehicle illegally left standing upon any highway in a position or under circumstances as to obstruct the normal movement of traffic.

Any peace officer is authorized to remove or cause to be removed to the nearest garage or other place of safety any vehicle found upon a highway when:

A report has been made that the vehicle has been stolen or taken without the consent of its owner; or

The person or persons in charge of the vehicle are unable to provide for its custody or removal; or

The person driving or in control of the vehicle is arrested for an alleged offense for which the officer is required by law to take the person arrested before a proper magistrate without unnecessary delay.

Whenever any peace officer finds a vehicle inoperable as a result of an accident and standing upon a highway, the officer is authorized to require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to have the vehicle removed from the scene of the accident to a position off the paved or main-traveled part of the highway. In the event that the owner of the vehicle is left incapacitated resulting from injuries suffered from the accident, the officer is authorized to have the inoperative vehicle moved from the scene to the nearest garage or other place of safety.

A peace officer is authorized to require the removal from the main-traveled part of the highway cargo or debris caused by a motor vehicle accident, provided that:

The accident occurs with no apparent serious personal injury or death; and

The removal can be accomplished safely and the removal will result in the improved safety or convenience of travel on the highway.

A transportation department employee in the exercise of the management, control and maintenance of a highway of the state highway system may assist in the removal from the main-traveled part of the highway cargo or debris caused by a motor vehicle accident when directed by a peace officer.

Neither the peace officer nor transportation department employee, nor anyone acting under the direction of the officer is liable for damage to the motor vehicle, cargo or debris caused by reasonable efforts of removal.

Nothing herein shall be construed to interfere with the duty of any city, county or state police officer to investigate and detect crime and enforce the penal, traffic or highway laws of this state or any political subdivision.

§ 49-663. Restricted use of neighborhood electric vehicles on highways.

It is unlawful to operate a neighborhood electric vehicle on any highway with a posted speed limit of over thirty-five (35) miles per hour.

It is unlawful for a person operating a neighborhood electric vehicle to cross any highway with a posted speed limit greater than forty-five (45) miles per hour.

§ 49-664. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-665. Riding on motorcycles.

A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon the permanent and regular seat attached to it, and the operator shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless the motorcycle is designed to carry more than one (1) person, in which event a passenger may ride upon the permanent and regular seat if designed for two (2) persons, or upon another seat firmly attached to the rear or side of the vehicle.

§ 49-666. Motorcycle, motorbike, UTV and ATV safety helmets — Requirements and standards.

No person under eighteen (18) years of age shall ride upon or be permitted to operate a motorcycle, motorbike, utility type vehicle or an all-terrain vehicle unless at all times when so operating or riding upon the vehicle he is wearing, as part of his motorcycle, motorbike, UTV or ATV equipment, a protective safety helmet of a type and quality equal to or better than the standards established for helmets by the director, except the provisions of this section shall not apply when such vehicles are operated or ridden on private property, or when used as an implement of husbandry, and shall also not apply to completely enclosed autocycles.

§ 49-667, 49-668. [Reserved.]

No person shall operate a snowmobile on any controlled-access highway.

No person shall operate a snowmobile on any other highway except when crossing the highway at a right angle, when use of the highway by other vehicles is impossible because of snow, or when the operation is authorized by the authority having jurisdiction over the highway.

§ 49-670. [Reserved.]

§ 49-672. Passenger safety for children.

No noncommercial motor vehicle operator shall transport a child who is six (6) years of age or younger in a motor vehicle manufactured with seat belts after January 1, 1966, unless the child is properly secured in a child safety restraint that meets the requirements of federal motor vehicle safety standard no. 213.

The provisions of this section shall not apply:

If all of the motor vehicle’s seat belts are in use, but in such an event any unrestrained child to which this section applies shall be placed in the rear seat of the motor vehicle, if it is so equipped; or

When the child is removed from the car safety restraint and held by the attendant for the purpose of nursing the child or attending the child’s other immediate physiological needs.

The failure to use a child safety restraint shall not be considered under any circumstances as evidence of contributory negligence, nor shall such failure be admissible as evidence in any civil action with regard to negligence.

§ 49-673. Safety restraint use.

Except as provided in section 49-672, Idaho Code, and subsection (2) of this section, each occupant of a motor vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight of not more than eight thousand (8,000) pounds, and that was manufactured with safety restraints in compliance with federal motor vehicle safety standard no. 208, shall have a safety restraint properly fastened about the occupant’s body at all times when the vehicle is in motion.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

An occupant of a motor vehicle who possesses a written statement from a licensed physician that the occupant is unable for medical reasons to wear a safety restraint;

Occupants of motorcycles, implements of husbandry and emergency vehicles;

Occupants of seats of a motor vehicle in which all safety restraints are then properly in use by other occupants of that vehicle; or

Mail carriers only if all vehicle regulations and safety practices of the United States postal service are adhered to.

A citation may be issued to:
(3)(a) A citation may be issued to:

Any occupant of the motor vehicle who is age eighteen (18) years or older and fails to wear a safety restraint as required in this section; and

The operator of the motor vehicle who is age eighteen (18) years or older if any occupant under eighteen (18) years of age fails to wear a safety restraint as required in this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, it shall be deemed a single violation regardless of the number of occupants not properly restrained.

Motor vehicles controlled and operated by any farmer when used in the transportation of the farmer’s farm equipment or in the transportation of supplies to the farmer’s farm;

The transportation of agricultural products at any time of the year;

Motor propelled vehicles for the sole purpose of carrying United States mail or property belonging to the United States;

Motor carriers transporting products of the forest at any time of the year, including chip trucks;

Motor carriers transporting products of the mine including sand, gravel and aggregates thereof, excepting petroleum products; and

Vehicles properly equipped, designed and customarily used for the transportation of disabled or abandoned vehicles by means of a crane, hoist, tow bar, dolly or roll bed, commonly known as a “wrecker truck” or “tow truck.” History.

A person issued a citation pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to a fine of ten dollars ($10.00), with five dollars ($5.00) of such fine to be apportioned to the catastrophic health care cost fund, as set forth in section 57-813, Idaho Code. A conviction under this subsection shall not result in violation point counts as prescribed in section 49-326, Idaho Code, nor shall such a conviction be deemed to be a moving traffic violation for the purpose of establishing rates of motor vehicle insurance charged by a casualty insurer.

A citation may be issued to the operator of the motor vehicle if the operator is under eighteen (18) years of age and the operator or any other occupant who is under eighteen (18) years of age fails to wear a safety restraint as required in this section. For purposes of this subsection, it shall be deemed a single violation regardless of the number of occupants not properly restrained. A person issued a citation pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to a fine of ten dollars ($10.00), five dollars ($5.00) of such fine to be apportioned to the catastrophic health care cost fund as set forth in section 57-813, Idaho Code, plus court costs. A conviction under this subsection shall not result in violation point counts as prescribed in section 49-326, Idaho Code. In addition, a conviction under this subsection shall not be deemed to be a moving traffic violation for the purpose of establishing rates of motor vehicle insurance charged by a casualty insurer.

Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished only as a secondary action when the operator of the motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of another law.

The department shall initiate and conduct an educational program, to the extent sufficient private donations or federal funds for this specific purpose are available to the department, to encourage compliance with the provisions of this section and to publicize the effectiveness of use of safety restraints and other restraint devices in reducing risk of harm to occupants of motor vehicles.

The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the provisions of this section and shall include a report of its findings in its annual evaluation report on the Idaho highway safety plan which it submits to the national highway traffic safety administration and federal highway administration pursuant to 23 U.S.C. section 402.

The failure to use a safety restraint shall not be considered under any circumstances as evidence of contributory or comparative negligence, nor shall such failure be admissible as evidence in any civil action with regard to negligence.

§ 49-674. Harvest season.

Harvest season for the purpose of vehicles transporting agricultural products shall be year-round.

§ 49-675. Legislative intent.

The Idaho transportation department and the Idaho state police are authorized to enter into one (1) or more joint exercise of powers agreements pursuant to sections 67-2328 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this act. The purpose of this legislation is to provide a practical inspection method to ensure regulation with a minimum amount of disruption.

§ 49-676. Dyed fuel — Inspection.

The provisions of this section shall be carried out through the use of existing state law enforcement and Idaho transportation department resources.

When stopped at a fixed or portable check station or when otherwise lawfully stopped as described in this section, any commercial diesel-powered motor vehicle that is within either of the definitions provided in section 49-123(2)(d) or (2)(e), Idaho Code, and that has a gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds may be subject to visual inspection for dyed fuel in the diesel fuel tanks mounted to such vehicle when the operator is requested to submit to such inspection:

By any Idaho state police officer, when so requested as a secondary action when the operator of the motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of another law;

By any Idaho state police officer at a fixed or portable check station established by the Idaho transportation department pursuant to the provisions of section 40-510, Idaho Code; or

By an authorized employee of the Idaho transportation department on duty at a fixed or portable check station established by the Idaho transportation department pursuant to the provisions of section 40-510, Idaho Code.

Neither the Idaho state police nor the Idaho transportation department shall set up random inspection stations for the purpose of testing for dyed diesel.

No state agency shall report any violation of section 63-2425, Idaho Code, to any agency of the federal government.

Inspection authority as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be limited solely to the motor vehicle inspected and shall not serve as reasonable suspicion for any state agency to thereafter inspect other motor vehicles, facilities, or property of the motor vehicle’s owner beyond the scope of subsection (2) of this section. Inspection authority shall not apply to portable fuel tanks or slip tanks that may be in the motor vehicle being inspected or to any bulk storage tanks.

If dyed fuel is discovered pursuant to an inspection authorized by this section, a citation shall be issued to the operator of the vehicle. The applicable penalty shall be as provided for in section 63-2460(2), Idaho Code, except that the penalty for a refusal of inspection shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000). No additional fines or penalties shall be imposed. The operator of the vehicle shall be responsible for any penalty pursuant to this section. All penalties collected shall be remitted to the state treasurer and placed in the highway distribution account.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the event of a disaster or emergency declared by the governor under chapter 10, title 46, Idaho Code, or by the president of the United States under the provisions of the disaster relief act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5121 et seq., if the use of dyed fuel is necessary to assist with such disaster or emergency.

For purposes of this section, “dyed fuel” means diesel fuel that has been dyed or marked at a refinery or terminal under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 4082 and regulations adopted thereunder or under the clean air act and regulations adopted thereunder on which the tax under section 63-2402, Idaho Code, has not been paid.

For purposes of this section, “highways” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 63-2401, Idaho Code.

By January 1, 2021, the Idaho transportation department and the Idaho state police shall enter into one (1) or more joint exercise of powers agreements pursuant to sections 67-2328 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
(11) Prior to conducting any inspections under the authority of this section, the Idaho state police and the Idaho transportation department, in collaboration with private groups, trade associations, and other dyed fuel user groups, shall provide outreach and education on the use of dyed fuels in Idaho for a period of six (6) months from the effective date of this section.

(12) The provisions of this section and associated funding shall be evaluated by the legislature following a period of five (5) years after the effective date of this section.

§ 49-677 — 49-680. [Reserved.]

§ 49-681 — 49-686. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-687. Racing on public highways. [Repealed.]

§ 49-688 — 49-690. [Reserved.]

§ 49-691 — 49-698. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-611. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-619. Slow moving vehicles — Restrictions and exceptions, equipment — Emblems on certain machinery — Limited exemption.

§ 49-621, 49-622. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-648. Obedience to signal indicating approach of train.

§ 49-654. Basic rule and maximum speed limits.

§ 49-669. Snowmobile operation limited.

§ 49-671. [Amended and Redesignated.]